Utah statutes.
78A-2-407.   Compensation -- Traveling expenses -- Frequency of payment.
The compensation of an official court reporter shall be fixed in accordance
with salary schedules for state court employees.  The official court reporter
shall also be paid for traveling expenses actually and necessarily incurred in
the performance of duties in accordance with Judicial Council policy.
